Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.220

Board—Membership—Vacancies.

(1) The board is created in the department of enterprise services to provide an evaluation of public capital projects construction processes, including the impact of contracting methods on project outcomes, and to advise the legislature on policies related to public works delivery methods.

(2) Members of the board identified in (a) through (f) of this subsection must be knowledgeable or have experience in public works procurement and contracting, including state and federal laws, rules, and best practices concerning public contracting for small, minority, women, and veteran-owned businesses, and are appointed as follows:

(a) Two representatives from construction general contracting; one representative from the architectural profession; one representative from the engineering profession; two representatives from construction specialty subcontracting; two representatives from construction trades labor organizations; one representative from the office of minority and women's business enterprises; one representative from a higher education institution; one representative from the department of enterprise services; one individual representing Washington cities; two representatives from private industry; one individual from the private sector representing the interests of the small, minority, women, or veteran-owned businesses community; and one representative of a domestic insurer authorized to write surety bonds for contractors in Washington state, each appointed by the governor. The board must reflect the gender, racial, ethnic, and geographic diversity of the state, including the interests of persons with disabilities. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term;

(b) One member representing counties, selected by the Washington state association of counties;

(c) One member representing public ports, selected by the Washington public ports association;

(d) One member representing public hospital districts, selected by the association of Washington public hospital districts;

(e) One member representing school districts, selected by the Washington state school directors' association;

(f) One member representing transit, selected by the Washington state transit association; and

(g) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each major caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, appointed by the president of the senate. Legislative members are nonvoting.

(3) Members selected under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on June 30th on the fourth year of the term.

(4) The board chair is selected from among the appointed members by the majority vote of the voting members.

(5) Legislative members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of the board, project review committee members, and committee chairs shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6) Vacancies are filled in the same manner as appointed. Members of the board may be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges by the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(7) The board shall meet as often as necessary.

(8) Board members are expected to consistently attend board meetings. The chair of the board may ask the governor to remove any member who misses more than two meetings in any calendar year without cause.

(9) The department of enterprise services shall provide staff support as may be required for the proper discharge of the function of the board.

(10) The board may establish committees as it desires and may invite nonmembers of the board to serve as committee members.

(11) The board shall provide opportunities for persons and entities not represented on the board to participate and provide insights on matters of interest to the board, particularly with respect to the experiences of small, minority, women, and veteran-owned businesses.

[ 2023 c 395 s 6; 2021 c 230 s 2; 2013 c 222 s 2; 2007 c 494 s 102; 2005 c 377 s 1. Formerly RCW 39.10.800.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Effective date—2021 c 230: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.